Utah statutes.
63M-1-403.   Powers of the office.
The office shall:
(1)  monitor the implementation and operation of this part and conduct a
continuing evaluation of the progress made in the enterprise zones;
(2)  evaluate an application from a county applicant or a municipal applicant
to be designated an enterprise zone and determine if the applicant qualifies
for that designation;
(3)  provide technical assistance to county applicants and municipal
applicants in developing applications for designation as enterprise zones;
(4)  assist county applicants and municipal applicants designated as
enterprise zones in obtaining assistance from the federal government and
agencies of the state;
(5)  assist a qualified business in obtaining the benefits of an incentive or
inducement program authorized by this part; and
(6)  prepare an annual evaluation based, in part, on data provided by the
State Tax Commission:
(a)  evaluating the effectiveness of the program and any suggestions for
legislation; and
(b)  that is available upon request to the governor and to the Revenue and
Taxation Interim Committee of the Legislature by November 1 of each year.
